Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.188.030

STEM education innovation alliance.

(1) The STEM education innovation alliance is established to advise the governor and to provide vision, guidance, assistance, and advice to support the initiatives under this chapter, as well as other current or proposed programs and initiatives across the spectrum of early learning through postsecondary education, that are intended to increase learning opportunities and improve educational outcomes in STEM.

(2) The governor's office, in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, shall invite representatives of STEM businesses, business and labor organizations with expertise in STEM fields, one or more nonprofit organizations with a mission to enhance STEM education from early learning through postsecondary education, school districts and institutions of higher education that have demonstrated leadership and innovation in STEM education, and STEM educators to participate in the alliance. Representatives from the governor's office, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and other state education agencies shall also participate as members of the alliance.

(3) The STEM education innovation alliance shall initiate its work by aligning and combining previous STEM education strategic plans into a single, cohesive, and comprehensive STEM framework for action and accountability. The framework must concentrate on a limited number of selected and specific measures that are meaningful indicators of progress in increasing STEM learning opportunities and in achieving the intended longer-term outcomes of such efforts. The framework must use measures that are quantifiable and based on data that are regularly and reliably collected statewide.

(4) Staff support for the STEM education innovation alliance shall be provided by the governor's office and the office of financial management, with support from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and other state education agencies as necessary.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 2.]